Louisiana, session 2026, HB647.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:3472(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3472. Methodology for dredging and deepening project evaluation
A.(1) Applications for funding of any waterway project may be submitted
by any governmental entity on a quarterly semi-annual basis, except as provided in
R.S. 34:3476. Applications shall be submitted to the office no later than the first of
March, June, and September, and December of each calendar year for consideration
of funding or funding obligation authority in the following fiscal years. Applications
submitted in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter shall be subject to the
provisions of R.S. 39:101 through 128. Information to be provided in the application
shall include but not be limited to the following:
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1283 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 647